test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tuli34_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tuli: # Noun (34) tuli 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tuli+N+Sg+Nom: tuli
     tuli+N+Sg+Gen: tulõ
     tuli+N+Sg+Par: tuld
     tuli+N+Sg+Ill: tullõ
     tuli+N+Pl+Gen: tulli
     tuli+N+Pl+Par: tulli
     tuli+N+Pl+Ill: [tullihe, tulli]
     tuli+N+Pl+All: [tullilõ, tulilõ]
